Massachusetts, session 194th, H1176.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 99 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Seventeenth, a company shall print, on a policy or notice of renewal that informs the
insured of a premium increase, information related to filing an insurance complaint with the
division of insurance, including, but not limited to, the right of an insured to file a complaint
regarding a change in premium or policy, phone number and contact information of the division
of insurance consumer service unit and webpage of division of insurance where a complaint can
be filed online. This information shall be included in the sentence immediately following the
sentence containing the updated premium amount.
of 1